District of Columbia statutes.
16-4012

Disclosure of information.

Except as provided by law other than this chapter, during the collaborative law process, upon the request of another party, a party shall make timely, full, candid, and informal disclosure of information related to the collaborative matter without formal discovery. A party also shall update promptly previously disclosed information that has materially changed. The parties may define the scope of disclosure during the collaborative law process.

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 12 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.